waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
aiksėjo/NPX
akceptavo/OPSX
aktualizavo/P
alkino/NPXdj
amaravo/NPXe
anglijo/NPXk
apdriokojo/NPX
apsijuokė/NPX
apžlibo/NPX
asfaltavo/NPXdp
atostogavo/NPXfiv
atsipeikėjo/ENPX
auklėjo/OPSXdfhpt
aušrojo/NPX
badėjo/NOPXdehlx
baksčiojo/NPX
balzgino/NPXl
barbeno/NPXfk
bastelėjo/NPX
belstelėjo/NPX
besiblausė/P
besidribino/P
besigiminiavo/P
besikeberiojo/P
besikėsino/P
besirabždino/P
besisvečiavo/P
besižaimijo/P
bimbino/NPX
birsnojo/NPX
blaivino/NPXdi
blikčiojo/NPXk
blogino/NPXefkrvw
blązgino/NOPX
bombardavo/NPXk
brankino/NPX
briketavo/NPX
brukštelėjo/NPX
brūkšėjo/NPX
budo/NOPXbdefikn
burbė/NPXaejk
bučiavo/OPSXdeflnprv
būdravo/NPX
capseno/NPX
cimbino/NPX
citavo/NPXf
dabojo/NPX
dalinėjo/NPXdf
datavo/NPX
debetavo/NPX
degutavo/NOPXdkpw
demokratino/NPXk
dervavo/NOPXcdep
dešifravo/NPX
dilbtelėjo/NPX
dingsojo/NPX
dirvonavo/NPXd
dobė/NPRXejlx
draiskaliavo/NPX
dreižė/NPX
driekė/PRSXdefjlpqx
driūktelėjo/ENPX
drunijo/NPXdfk
drąsino/NOPXcdfkoprw
drūtėjo/NPXfk
dulkė/NPXbdefkl
dunkstelėjo/NPX
dvailino/NPXk
dvilktelėjo/NPX
dvėsinėjo/NPXd
dyrinėjo/NPX
dzūkėjo/NPXk
dėsčiojo/NPXdk
dūmojo/NPXf
džiovė/PRSXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
eiliojo/NPXa
emigravo/NPX
ešelonavo/NPX
finišavo/NPX
gagnojo/ENPX
gaišino/NOPXdefijklp
gangrino/NPX
garglino/NPX
gausino/NPXf
geidavo/NPXf
geltonėjo/NPX
gestikuliavo/NPX
ginklavo/OPSXaehmq
girgžduliavo/NPX
glamžavo/OPSXk
gliaumėjo/NPXaj
glumino/NOPXkw
gniutino/NPX
gokčiojo/NPXk
gramozdijo/NPX
grebojo/NPX
gribštavo/NPX
griovė/PRSXacdefgklouvwx
gromuliavo/NPXk
grupavo/OPSXdfhjkptvw
grėsė/NPXbcejl
gudo/NPXbceijk
gumbo/NPX
gurgeno/NPX
gužėjo/NPXbcdejk
gyslinėjo/NPXd
gėliavo/NPX
gūžtavo/NPX
ieškinėjo/NPX
implantavo/OPSXotvw
inicijavo/OPSX
interesavo/OPSXk
irzo/NPXk
iškylavo/NPX
išsipardavė/NPX
jaukino/NOPXejv
jonizavo/NPX
juodino/NOPXacdeklpw
kabaravo/NOPXo
kainojo/NPXceh
kaišiojo/NPXabcdfjkl
kalkino/NPXcefl
kampinėjo/NPX
kapanojo/NOPXpqx
karino/NPXk
karto/NPXacfjkl
kasiojo/NOPXadefjklqr
kaukštelėjo/NPX
keberiokštelėjo/NPX
kelmavo/OPSX
kepurėjo/NPX
kervino/NPX
keverzinėjo/NPX
kiaušino/NPXd
kildino/NPXk
kinivarpojo/NPX
kirbėjo/NPX
kirptelėjo/NPX
kiurkė/NPX
kiūtojo/PSXd
klampojo/EOPSXbcdefghjk
klebtelėjo/NPX
klekeno/NPXk
klerkė/NPXl
klibčiojo/NPX
kliro/NPX
kliustelėjo/NPX
klubundavo/NPX
klydinėjo/NPX
klūpčiojo/NPX
knaptelėjo/NPX
knežo/NPXk
knirksėjo/NPX
kniūpojo/NPX
kodavo/NPXbcdhlntx
komplikavo/OPSXkw
konfūzijo/OPSXk
kontūzijo/NPX
korijo/NPXd
krago/NPXb
krankčiojo/NPX
kraujavo/NPXef
kreivojo/NOPXdep
kresnojo/NPX
krikštijo/NOPXfht
krito/NPXabcdefghijkl
krunėjo/NPX
krykštė/NPXk
krūmojo/NPX
kuklėjo/NPXk
kumečiavo/NPX
kuokinėjo/NPX
kurkė/NPXfjkl
kuštelėjo/NPX
kvaišėjo/NPXk
kvarksojo/NPXd
kviesliavo/NPX
kvykė/NPXk
kyburiavo/NPX
kąsčiojo/NPX
kūbrinėjo/NPX
kūrinėjo/NPX
laistinėjo/NPXf
lalėjo/NPXd
lapnojo/NPXjk
lavėjo/NPXd
leidinėjo/NPXbcdefhij
lenkėjo/NPXk
lesė/NPRXadefijklqv
lietuvėjo/NPXk
liniavo/NPXdk
lipšnėjo/NPXk
liurbino/NPX
lošinėjo/OPSXabdfhiklmnopqrtuvwx
luteno/NPX
lėbavo/NPX
lūžo/NPXabcdefhijkl
makaravo/NPX
malonėjo/NOPXfj
margėjo/NPXf
maskatavo/NPXdfk
maumojo/NPXk
mechanėjo/NPX
meldė/PRSXdrv
mestelėjo/NPX
mielino/NPX
miksėjo/NPXk
mirgavo/NPX
mitrino/NOPXdp
mokino/NPX
mostelėjo/NPX
muistė/OPRSXYfkrw
murmino/NPXd
mygo/NOPXcdefjkvw
mėlo/NPXfl
mūksojo/NPX
nakvojo/NPXfhm
naujino/NPXbfn
nebesibylinėjo/P
nebesidžiaugė/P
nebesigubojo/P
nebesikepurnėjo/P
nebesinašino/P
nebesiruošinėjo/P
nebesivadėjo/P
nebėjo/P
nesibaisėjo/P
nesidienijo/P
nesigardžiavo/P
nesikamuoliavo/P
nesikuopojo/P
nesipliuškino/P
nesispyriavo/P
nesiyrinėjo/P
niaukė/PRSXalm
nirtino/NPXl
niurzgė/NPXk
noko/NPXadefhijk
nuimliojo/NPX
nusibodėjo/NPX
nužliuožė/NPX
okupavo/NPXv
paaugėjo/NPX
pagrožo/NPX
pajojėjo/NPX
paleistuvavo/NPX
pampsojo/NPX
paptelėjo/NPX
parpsojo/NPX
pasidomėjo/NPX
pasinašino/NPX
pastalgo/NPX
paukščiavo/NPX
pačiuožėjo/NPX
pelenėjo/NPX
perino/NPX
pešiojo/OPSXadefijklmpqruvw
pikavo/NPX
pilkavo/NPXk
pipiravo/NPX
plagijavo/NPX
plaukinėjo/NPX
plekštelėjo/NPX
plezdeno/NPX
plieskė/PRSXacdefhiklmopqtuwx
pliumpsėjo/NPXk
pliurškė/PRSXk
plonino/NPXdefkr
pluošė/NPXd
plėstelėjo/NPX
plūšino/NOPXd
ponavo/NOPXk
pozavo/OPSXfv
prasidžiugo/NPX
pražiuro/NPX
priešgyniavo/NPX
prisijuokė/NPX
prodiusavo/NPXfjkv
protino/NOPXdfk
puknojo/NPX
puošė/PRSXadefmpqrtvw
purpsojo/NPX
puslapiavo/NP
pužino/NPX
pyplinėjo/NPX
pėsčiavo/NPX
pūslinėjo/ENPX
raibavo/NPX
raičiojo/OPSXk
ramino/OPSXaefjkmq
ratifikavo/NPX
rauliojo/NPX
rašydino/NPXfkl
reguliavo/OPSXdefhkqrw
rembėjo/NPXck
reprezentavo/OPSX
rezgė/NPRXbdekl
riebino/NPX
rimtino/NPX
rito/OPSXbcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
rodinėjo/NPXacefor
rukšlojo/NPX
rusnojo/NPX
rytiečiavo/NPX
rėplinėjo/NPX
rūgštėjo/NPXf
sagstinėjo/NPX
salietravo/NPXf
sankcionavo/NPX
sausėjo/OPSXadef
seimavo/NPX
sendino/NOPXfkqr
siaurino/NPXefkrw
sielvartavo/NPX
sintetino/NPXk
siutino/NPXcl
skaidrėjo/NPXefi
skambino/OPSXaefhjknrvw
skarinėjo/NPX
skeldėjo/NPXk
skiemenavo/NPXk
sklezdėjo/NPX
skraidžiojo/NPX
skrudo/OPSXafjk
skutinėjo/NPXdj
skystino/NPXefk
slidavo/NPX
sliūkinėjo/NPX
slūgino/NPX
smalkino/NPXj
smelkė/PRSXefhko
smogtelėjo/NPX
smėlo/NPXf
snukiavo/NOPX
sopino/NPX
spausdino/OPSXbcdhjnoptv
spinduliavo/NPXa
sponsoriavo/NPXfv
sprigtavo/OPSX
sprūdojo/NPX
spyrinėjo/NPX
sriubsnojo/NPX
stabarėjo/NPXk
stangino/NPX
stebėjo/OPSXfnoqv
stimpino/NPXe
storino/NPXfk
strazdanojo/NOPX
stropėjo/NPXk
stybo/NPX
styrinėjo/NPX
subiurokratėjo/NPX
sufleravo/NPX
sukvailo/NPX
sunkėjo/NPXf
surstelėjo/NPX
susislėgėjo/NPX
suulbo/NPX
sužvango/NPX
sveikavo/NPX
svilino/NOPXadefjklmqrw
svyrėjo/NPXef
sėklino/NPXa
tabalavo/NPX
talatavo/NPX
tamsėjo/NPXdefk
taranavo/NPX
tarškė/NPXkl
tauškino/NPXfk
tebesibylinėjo/P
tebesidžiaugė/P
tebesigubojo/P
tebesikepurnėjo/P
tebesinašino/P
tebesiruošinėjo/P
tebesivadėjo/P
tebėjo/P
telefonavo/NPXf
teptelėjo/NPX
teršė/PRSXajklmvwx
tesideklasavo/P
tesigaivelėjo/P
tesijovijo/P
tesikuklino/P
tesipačiavo/P
tesislėgėjo/P
tesiveršiavo/P
tešlavo/NOPXkw
tikslino/OPSXfkorw
timpčiojo/NPXf
tirliavo/NPX
tiško/NPXacdejkl
trainiojo/OPSXr
trandijo/NPXk
tratėjo/NPXbcdegikl
treliavo/NPX
tresnojo/NPX
trigubėjo/NPXfk
triokšėjo/NPX
triškavo/NPX
trupino/NOPXacdefjko
tryškino/NPX
trūnėjo/NPXk
turleno/NOPX
tuskėjo/NPXfk
tvankėjo/NPXf
tvinkčiojo/NPX
tvoskė/PRSX
tylėjo/NPXdefiv
tįsiojo/NPX
tūpė/PRSXaejklnx
unkščiojo/NPX
urvavo/NPX
užbirgzgė/NPX
užsigardžiavo/NPX
vacalavo/NPX
vaikino/NOPXco
vaizdino/NPX
valinėjo/NOPX
vampsojo/NPX
vapsėjo/NPX
varlino/NPX
varvėjo/NPXacdejkl
vaškavo/OPSXacdfhijkmoprtuvw
vegetavo/NPX
velniavo/OPSX
vergavo/NPX
verstakiavo/NPX
vežė/PRSXabcdefghijklnopqstvwx
viepė/PRSXbdinpu
vikstelėjo/NPX
vilmino/NPX
vipsėjo/NPX
virpsojo/NPX
virveno/NPX
vizgeno/NPX
vogė/NPRXadefjkmqrv
vulgarėjo/NPXk
vystelėjo/NPX
vėduliavo/NPX
vėrė/PRSXbcdeghijklnopqtuvwx
zagnojo/NPX
zirkė/NPX
zulino/OPSXaefikqr
zvimbčiojo/NPX
čeksėjo/NPX
čiaudėjo/NPXklq
čiksėjo/NPXk
čirpė/NPXfk
čiulpė/PRSXYacdefjklov
čiurkšėjo/NPX
čiūkštelėjo/NPX
čyrino/NPX
įbaudžiavino/NPX
įpusėjo/NPX
įvairino/NPXf
šalnojo/NPXef
šarmojo/NPXaef
šefavo/NPX
šiaušino/NPX
šipuliavo/NPX
šiupo/NPX
šiušino/NPX
šlamėjo/OPSXbdefgijklorv
šlempino/NPX
šliaužiojo/NPXdfk
šliuožė/NPXabcdefghijlou
šlubtelėjo/NPX
šmakštelėjo/NPX
šmižėjo/NPX
šnabždeno/NPX
šnerpštė/PRSX
šniukštinėjo/NPXafk
šoko/NOPXabcdefghijklnopqruvx
šurmuliavo/NPX
švartavo/OPSX
švepsėjo/NPX
švilpė/NPXbdefgikqw
švystelėjo/NPX
šūdino/NPXadjkmpvw
ūkininkavo/NPX
žabalino/NPX
žagčiojo/NPX
žalsvėjo/NPXf
žegnojo/OPSXht
ženklino/NOPXfkw
žibseno/NPX
žilino/NPXefil
žioplino/NPX
žirgsėjo/NPX
žlebeno/NPXk
žliugino/NPXf
žmogžudžiavo/NPX
žoliavo/NOPXfjrv
žvangino/NPXefk
žvilgsėjo/NPX
žvėrėjo/NPXk
žygiavo/OPSXabcdefghijknoquv
